Spring 2015/CS581/numbers.lexc
! Trevor Cargile
! CS581 - Homework 3 part 2
! 813542789

Definitions
		Dig = %0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9 ;
		First = %2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9 ;
		Restrict = %0|1|2|3 ;
		REDID = [8]Dig^{8,8} ;			
		Phone = [[First]Dig^{6,6}] | [[First]Dig^{2,2} %- Dig^{4,4}] ;
		Combo = [Restrict]Dig %- [Restrict]Dig %- [Restrict]Dig ;

! Reasonings for each:
		! REDid's always start with 8 and then have 8 more digits afterwards.
		! Local numbers must start with a digit between 2 - 9, the rest can be 0 - 9.
			! You can't put spaces anywhere in the full phone number.
		! Combination lock numbers can't exceed 40.
			! There also needs to be 3 of them in order with a dash in between them.
			! It won't be accepted if there is no - in between the three numbers.

LEXICON Root
< REDID %+RedID:0 >	#;
< Phone %+LocalNumber:0 >	#;
< Combo %+ComboLock:0 >		#;
